Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5129.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [15.751] JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN INTERNATIONAL ORGANIZATIONS. new text end new text begin The World Health Organization, United Nations, and the World Economic Forum shall have no jurisdiction or power within the state of Minnesota. No rule, regulation, fee, tax, policy, or mandate of any kind of the World Health Organization, United Nations, and the World Economic Forum shall be enforced or implemented by the state of Minnesota or any agency, department, board, commission, political subdivision, governmental entity of the state, county, municipality, or any other political entity. new text end